Utah statutes.
63H-1-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Authority" means the Military Installation Development Authority, created under Section 63H-1-201.

(2)  "Base taxable value" means:

(a)  for military land or other land that was exempt from a property tax at the time that a project area was created that included the military land or other land, a taxable value of zero; or

(b)  for private property that is included in a project area, the taxable value of the property within any portion of the project area, as designated by board resolution, from which tax increment will be collected, as shown upon the assessment roll last equalized before the year in which the authority issues a building permit for a building within that portion of the project area.

(3)  "Board" means the governing body of the authority created under Section 63H-1-301.

(4) (a)  "Dedicated supplemental tax increment" means supplemental tax increment that results from a property tax levied by:

(i)  a county, including any district the county has established under Subsection 17-34-3(2) to levy a property tax under Title 17, Chapter 34, Municipal-Type Services to Unincorporated Areas; or

(ii)  an included municipality.

(b)  "Dedicated supplemental tax increment" does not include a property tax levied by a county to assess and collect property taxes under Subsections 59-2-1602(1) and (4).

(5)  "Development project" means a project to develop land within a project area.

(6)  "Elected member" means a member of the authority board who:

(a)  is a mayor or member of a legislative body appointed under Subsection 63H-1-302(2)(b); or

(b) (i)  is appointed to the authority board under Subsection 63H-1-302(2)(a) or (3); and

(ii)  concurrently serves in an elected state, county, or municipal office.

(7)  "Included municipality" means a municipality, some or all of which is included within a project area.

(8)  "Military land" means any land or facility, including any leased land or facility, that is part of a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, or installation under the jurisdiction of the U.S. Department of Defense or the Utah National Guard.

(9)  "Municipal energy tax" means a municipal energy sales and use tax under Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal Energy Sales and Use Tax Act.

(10)  "Municipal services revenue" means revenue that the authority:

(a)  collects from the authority's:

(i)  levy of a municipal energy tax;

(ii)  levy of a telecommunications tax;

(iii)  imposition of a transient room tax; and

(iv)  imposition of a resort communities tax;

(b)  receives under Subsection 59-12-205(2)(b)(ii); and

(c)  receives as dedicated supplemental tax increment.

(11)  "Municipal tax" means a municipal energy tax, telecommunications tax, transient room tax, or resort communities tax.

(12)  "Project area" means the land, including military land, whether consisting of a single contiguous area or multiple noncontiguous areas, described in a project area plan or draft project area plan where the development project set forth in the project area plan or draft project area plan takes place or is proposed to take place.

(13)  "Project area budget" means a multiyear projection of annual or cumulative revenues and expenses and other fiscal matters pertaining to a project area that includes:

(a)  the base taxable value of property in the project area;

(b)  the projected tax increment expected to be generated within the project area;

(c)  the amount of tax increment expected to be shared with other taxing entities;

(d)  the amount of tax increment expected to be used to implement the project area plan, including the estimated amount of tax increment to be used for land acquisition, public improvements, infrastructure improvements, and loans, grants, or other incentives to private and public entities;

(e)  the tax increment expected to be used to cover the cost of administering the project area plan;

(f)  if tax increment is to be collected at different times or from different portions of the project area, or both:

(i) (A)  the tax identification numbers of the parcels from which tax increment will be collected; or

(B)  a legal description of the portion of the project area from which tax increment will be collected; and

(ii)  an estimate of when other portions of the project area will become subject to tax increment collection; and

(g)  for property that the authority owns or leases and expects to sell or sublease, the expected total cost of the property to the authority and the expected selling price or lease payments.

(14)  "Project area plan" means a written plan that, after its effective date, guides and controls the development within a project area.

(15)  "Property tax" includes privilege tax and each levy on an ad valorem basis on tangible or intangible personal or real property.

(16)  "Public entity" means:

(a)  the state, including any of its departments or agencies; or

(b)  a political subdivision of the state, including a county, city, town, school district, local district, special service district, or interlocal cooperation entity.

(17)  "Publicly owned infrastructure and improvements" means water, sewer, storm drainage, electrical, telecommunications, and other similar systems and lines, streets, roads, curb, gutter, sidewalk, walkways, parking facilities, public transportation facilities, and other buildings, facilities, infrastructure, and improvements that:

(a)  benefit the public; and

(b)  are:

(i)  publicly owned or owned by a utility; or

(ii)  publicly owned or publicly maintained or operated by the authority or another public entity.

(18)  "Remaining municipal services revenue" means municipal services revenue that the authority has not spent during its fiscal year for municipal services as provided in Subsection 63H-1-503(1).

(19)  "Resort communities tax" means a sales and use tax imposed under Section 59-12-401.

(20)  "Supplemental tax increment" means tax increment remaining after the authority is paid the tax increment it is entitled to receive under Subsection 63H-1-501(1).

(21)  "Taxable value" means the value of property as shown on the last equalized assessment roll as certified by the county assessor.

(22)  "Tax increment" means the difference between:

(a)  the amount of property tax revenues generated each tax year by all taxing entities from the area within a project area designated in the project area plan as the area from which tax increment is to be collected, using the current assessed value of the property; and

(b)  the amount of property tax revenues that would be generated from that same area using the base taxable value of the property.

(23)  "Taxing entity" means a public entity that levies a tax on property within a project area.

(24)  "Telecommunications tax" means a telecommunications license tax under Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 4, Municipal Telecommunications License Tax Act.

(25)  "Transient room tax" means a tax under Section 59-12-352.

